California statutes. Water Code
(2) The amounts necessary to make payments under any contracts,
 agreements, or obligations entered into by it pursuant hereto, in the amounts and at the times they shall become due.

(3) Reserves in such amount as may be determined by the department from time to time to be necessary or desirable.

(4) The administrative costs of the department incurred in administering this division.

(5) After meeting the purposes in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the transfer of any remaining revenue requirement amount to the account.

(b) The commission shall not revise the revenue requirement established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 80524 at any time before January 1, 2046. For avoidance of doubt, the revenue requirement established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 80524 shall not be imposed and collected until
 the department has legally defeased or paid at maturity the bonds issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 80540 and provided written notice thereof to the commission.

(c) This section shall become inoperative if a large electrical corporation elects not to participate pursuant to Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code and is repealed on January 1 of the year following the notification by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 3299 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 72.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Department of Water Resources Charge Fund [80550. - 80550.]

80550.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Department of Water Resources Charge Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department and shall be available for the purposes of this division.

(b) All revenues payable to the department under this division, including proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 80540), shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding any other law, interest accruing on the moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the fund and shall be used for purposes of this division. Payments from the fund may be made only for the following purposes:

(1) Payment of any bonds or other contractual obligations authorized by this division.

(2) The expenses incurred by the department in administering this division.

(3) Consistent with Section 3288 of the Public Utilities Code, repayment of principal of, and interest on, loans made from the Surplus Money Investment Fund to the Wildfire Fund. Repayment of loans made from the Surplus Money Investment Fund shall be made as soon as practicable.

(4) The transfers to the Wildfire Fund.

(c) Obligations authorized by this division shall be payable solely from the fund. Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state are or may be pledged for any payment under any obligation authorized by this division.

(d) While any obligations of the department incurred under this division remain outstanding and not fully performed or discharged, the rights, powers, duties, and existence of the department and the commission shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of or parties to those obligations. The department may include this pledge and undertaking of the state in the department’s obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 57.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 29. ELECTRICITY SUPPLY STRATEGIC RELIABILITY RESERVE PROGRAM [80700. - 80730.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [80700. - 80701.]

80700.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California is a leader in driving the affordable and equitable transition to a clean reliable energy system and economy. However, the impacts of climate change are occurring sooner and with more intensity and frequency than previously anticipated.

(2) Extreme events from climate change, including heat waves, wildfires, and drought, combined with other factors, such as supply chain disruptions, are jeopardizing California’s ability to build out the electrical infrastructure needed to maintain affordability and reliability.

(3) As California
 transitions to a clean energy future and contends with climate impacts and other challenges, sufficient capacity of new and existing generation assets will be required to maintain reliability during extreme events.

(4) California must ensure electricity reliability during this period of heightened risk, which includes extraordinary near-term measures and substantive changes to mid-term energy policy, while also ensuring the multifaceted California electrical grid is best positioned to sustainably and equitably achieve California’s clean energy future, climate targets, and air quality requirements.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) The enactment of this division further the purposes of Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 25790) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code. The development and operation
 of a program as provided in this division is in all respects for the welfare and the benefit of the people of the state, to protect public peace, health, and safety, and constitutes an essential governmental purpose. This division shall be liberally construed in a manner so as to effectuate its purposes and objectives.

(2) The powers and responsibilities of the department established under this division are not governed by the provisions related to the State Water Resources Development System pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6, and this division should not constitute a limitation on, or modification of, the department’s authority pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 13.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

80700.5.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 14.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80701.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California balancing authority” has the same meaning set forth in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) “Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(c) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 13.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Agreements [80710. - 80714.]

80710.

(a) The department, in consultation with the commission, shall implement projects, purchases, and contracts to carry out the purposes of Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 25790) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code, including, but not limited to, the Distributed Electricity Backup Assets Program and the Demand Side Grid Support Program.

(b) (1) In furtherance of subdivision (a) and notwithstanding any other law, the department may construct, own and operate, or contract for the construction and operation of, contract for the purchase of electricity from, or finance through loans, reimbursement agreements, or other contracts actions to secure resources for summer reliability or to preserve the option to extend the life of only the
 following facilities:

(A) Extension of the operating life of existing nonnuclear generating facilities planned for retirement.

(B) New emergency and temporary power generators of five megawatts or more. If a generator is operated using diesel fuel, the department shall not operate it after July 31, 2023.

(C) New energy storage systems that are located outside of the coastal zone and the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, of 20 megawatts or more, that are capable of discharging for at least two hours.

(D) Generation facilities that are located outside of the coastal zone and the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission and use clean, zero-emission fuel technology of any size
 to produce electricity.

(E) Supporting the development of zero-emission generation capacity with a point of interconnection at a California balancing authority, with the majority of its capacity contracted for by a load-serving entity that has a service area primarily in California, with an operational date no later than December 31, 2024. For purposes of this subparagraph, only a facility with a net qualifying capacity of at least 50 percent of its nameplate capacity, as estimated at 8:00 p.m. on a date in September, shall be eligible.

(2) In furtherance of subdivision (a) of Section 80700, the department may reimburse electrical corporations, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, for the value of imported energy or import capacity products that are (A) delivered or capable of being delivered between July 1, 2022, and on or before October 31, 2023, and (B) are
 procured at above-market costs or in excess of procurement authorizations set by the Public Utilities Commission and above the requirements needed to serve its bundled customers in support of summer electric service reliability.

(c) Facilities, except those new energy storage systems described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that charge from the electrical grid but do not otherwise use any form of fossil fuel or fuel derived from fossil fuels, constructed and owned by the department or under a contract with the department pursuant to this division that use any form of fossil fuel shall only operate as necessary to respond to extreme events, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 25790.5 of the Public Resources Code, and shall not operate at any other time.

(d) Facilities constructed by the department or under a contract with the department pursuant to this division shall not constitute State Water Resources Development System facilities under Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(e) (1) The department shall consult with the commission, the Public Utilities Commission, the Independent System Operator or other applicable California balancing authorities, and the State Air Resources Board in carrying out the purposes of this division.

(2) Beginning October 1, 2022, and at least every three months thereafter, the department shall provide an update on the investments made and being considered into the strategic reliability reserve at a commission business meeting. The President of the Public Utilities Commission or the
 president’s designee and the President of the Independent System Operator or the president’s designee shall attend the presentation.

(3) The department shall prioritize investments that do not compete with generating facilities already planned for development and disclosed by load-serving entities or local publicly owned electric utilities.

(4) In fulfilling the requirements of this division to achieve electricity reliability, the department shall prioritize investments in feasible, cost-effective zero-emission resources, and then feasible, cost-effective conventional resources.

(f) The department shall develop, execute, and implement contracts covering power generation, operation and maintenance, fuel management, site leases, power settlements, invoice verification, billing, and other associated items. The
 department shall also enter into contracts for external services to provide specialized expertise.

(g) (1) Contracts entered into pursuant to this division, amendments to those contracts during their terms, or contracts for services reasonably related to those contracts, and entered on or before December 31, 2023, shall not be subject to competitive bidding or any other state contracting requirements, shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency, and are not subject to the requirements of the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, or the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to any contract, grant, or loan
 entered into for purposes of this chapter that does not directly contribute to electrical grid reliability by October 31, 2027.

(3) This subdivision is inoperative December 1, 2026.

(h) For contracts entered into pursuant to this division, amendments to those contracts during their terms, or contracts for services reasonably related to those contracts, and executed after December 31, 2023, Sections 10295, 10297, and 10340 of the Public Contact Code do not apply to a contract that meets the conditions established by the department for those contracts.

(i) For contracts entered into pursuant to this division by the department after October 31, 2022, the department shall notify the commission through an investment plan of the terms, costs, and scope at a commission business meeting and the commission shall consider the
 investment plan for approval in a meeting held consistent with the terms of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25200) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code. No less than 10 days after the commission approves the investment plan, the executive director of the commission shall give written notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the action.

(j) A contract entered into, or an approval granted by the department pursuant to this division is not subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) and regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

(k) Facilities constructed by the department or under a contract with the department pursuant to this division shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Regulations issued by the State Air
 Resources Board pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 38530) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code, including the requirement to disclose emissions of greenhouse gases from facilities.

(2) Regulations issued by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 38570) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code, including the requirement to comply with any market-based compliance mechanism established by the State Air Resources Board.

(l) The department may adopt guidelines to implement this division. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to any regulation or guidelines adopted by the department pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 15, Sec. 8.   (SB 127)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

80711.

The department, in consultation with the commission, shall recover all of the costs it incurs pursuant to this chapter from the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund established pursuant to Section 80720. The department and its customers shall not bear any of the costs associated with carrying out the purposes of Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 25790) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code, and those costs shall not be included in the prices, rates, and charges for water and electricity under the water supply contracts executed pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 13.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

80712.

The department may do any of the following as necessary, as determined by the department, for purposes of this division:

(a) Engage the services of private parties to render professional and technical assistance and advice and other services in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Contract for the services of other public agencies.

(c) Engage in activities or enter into contracts or arrangements as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division.

(d) Hire personnel necessary and desirable for
 the timely and successful implementation and administration of the department’s duties and responsibilities pursuant to this division. The State Personnel Board and the Department of Human Resources shall assist the department in expediting that hiring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 13.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

80713.

(a) (1) On and before June 30, 2027, if the Department of Water Resources determines that resources it procured through the Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program were used in a given month to meet a load-serving entity’s identified reliability need, the Public Utilities Commission shall annually assess a capacity payment on each load-serving entity that during that same month fails to meet its system resource adequacy requirements pursuant to Section 380 of the Public Utilities Code. The capacity payment is not a penalty and does not prohibit the Public Utilities Commission from assessing a penalty on a load-serving entity for a failure to comply with any resource adequacy requirement.

(2) If a
 load-serving entity fails to comply with its system resource adequacy requirements pursuant to Section 380 in a month when resources procured by the Department of Water Resources through the Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program are used to meet the load-serving entity’s identified reliability need and a penalty is assessed by the commission on the load-serving entity for that failure, then, on and before June 30, 2027, both of the following requirements shall apply:

(A) If the penalty is less than the capacity payment, the capacity payment shall be reduced by the amount of the penalty and the penalty shall be deposited into the Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account.

(B) If the penalty is more than the capacity payment, then an amount of the penalty equal to the otherwise applicable capacity payment shall be deposited into the Load-Serving Entity Capacity
 Payment Account.

(3) The annual capacity payment shall be remitted to the Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account by a load-serving entity that was assessed a capacity payment pursuant to paragraph (1) within 30 days of the commission notifying the load-serving entity.

(b) The Public Utilities Commission, in consultation with the commission, shall determine a capacity payment unit cost in kilowatt per month for load-serving entities that is based on the monthly cost of the resources procured using moneys from the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund, including the Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account, with the total costs weighted two-thirds for June through September and one-third for the remaining eight months, and this unit cost shall be multiplied by the amount of kilowatts that the load-serving entity was deficient in its
 system resource adequacy requirements during the same month the Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program resources were used, based on the resource adequacy program rules, requirements, and resource counting conventions in place at the time of the deficiency, after crediting the deficient load-serving entity with its share of any reliability resources procured by other entities on its behalf. The Public Utilities Commission may make any further adjustments to the capacity values of any nonperforming resources included in a load-serving entity’s portfolio when determining the amount of this deficiency. Any adjustments made by the Public Utilities Commission shall align with any adjustments made by the commission as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 80714.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 31, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 12.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.   Operative January 31, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

80714.

(a) (1) Upon the submission of the report pursuant to subdivision (d) and on and before June 30, 2027, if the Department of Water Resources determines that resources it procured through the Electricity Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program were used in a given month to meet an identified reliability need, the executive director of the commission shall annually assess a capacity payment on each local publicly owned electric utility in the Independent System Operator balancing area that during that same month fails to meet its minimum planning reserve margin.

(2) The annual capacity payment shall be remitted to the Local Publicly Owned Electric Utility Capacity Payment Account by a local publicly owned electric utility
 that was assessed a capacity payment pursuant to paragraph (1) within 30 days of the executive director notifying the local publicly owned electric utility.

(b) Upon the submission of the report pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall determine a capacity payment unit cost in kilowatt per month for local publicly owned electric utilities that is based on the monthly cost of the resources procured using moneys from the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund, including the Local Publicly Owned Electric Utility Capacity Payment Account, with the total costs weighted two-thirds for June through September and one-third for the remaining eight months, and this unit cost shall be multiplied by the amount of kilowatts that the local publicly owned electric utility was deficient in its minimum planning reserve margin during the same month the Electricity
 Supply Strategic Reliability Reserve Program resources were used using the same resource counting conventions applied by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 80713, after crediting the deficient local publicly owned electric utilities with their share of any reliability resources procured by other entities on their behalf. The commission may make any further adjustments to the capacity values of any nonperforming resources included in a local publicly owned electric utility’s portfolio when determining the amount of this deficiency. Any adjustments made by the commission shall align with any adjustments made by the Public Utilities Commission as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 80713.

(c) Upon the submission of the report pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(d) On or before January
 31, 2024, the commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and budget committees of the Legislature that includes an assessment of whether each local publicly owned electric utility exceeded, met, or failed to meet its minimum planning reserve margin for 2023 and the system resource adequacy requirements from June 1, 2023, to September 30, 2023, inclusive, that the Public Utilities Commission established for load-serving entities pursuant to Section 380 of the Public Utilities Code and adopted in Public Utilities Commission Decision 22-06-050 (June 23, 2022) Decision Adopting Local Capacity Obligations for 2023–2025, Flexible Capacity Obligations for 2023, and Reform Track Framework.

(e) For purposes of this section, “minimum planning reserve margin” means a local publicly owned electric utility’s planning reserve margin, as described in Section 9620 of the Public Utilities
 Code, unless the local publicly owned electric utility revises that planning reserve margin based on recommendations from the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25704.5 of the Public Resources Code, in which case “minimum planning reserve margin” means the local publicly owned electric utility’s revised minimum planning reserve margin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 13.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund [80720. - 80720.]

80720.

(a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, and shall be available for the purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710).

(c) Obligations authorized and expenses incurred by the department in administering this division shall be payable solely from the fund.

(d) Except as specified in subdivisions (h) and (i), all revenues payable to the department for activities undertaken by the
 department under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710) shall be deposited into the fund.

(e) The fund shall be separate and distinct from any other fund and moneys administered by the department and any interest earned on the moneys in the fund shall be used solely for purposes of this division.

(f) When fixed assets procured under the authority of this division are sold or otherwise disposed of, the revenue from the sale or disposition, including any gain or loss, measured by the difference between book value and selling price, shall be deposited into the fund and available to the department for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710). Any remaining revenue from the sale or other disposition of fixed assets procured under the authority of this division shall be returned to the General Fund once all obligations of the department are satisfied after the wind down
 of this division and the closure of the fund. While any obligation of the department incurred under this division remains outstanding and not fully performed or discharged, the rights, powers, duties, and existence of the department shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will adversely affect the interests and rights of the holders of or parties to those obligations.

(g) (1) For activities undertaken by the department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710), the department may obtain applicable credits pursuant to the federal Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169). If the department elects for direct payment of those applicable credits, those payments shall be deposited directly into the fund.

(2) Within 10 days of any payments being deposited into the fund, described in paragraph (1), the department shall provide
 written notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, who shall provide a copy of the notice to the relevant policy committees. The notice shall include the source, purpose, timeliness, and other relevant information as determined by the department.

(3) Use of the payments shall be consistent with all of the following:

(A) The payments shall be expended for a purpose that is consistent with state law.

(B) Acceptance of the payments does not impose on the state any requirement to commit or expend new state funds for any program or purpose.

(C) The need exists to expend the payments during the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(D) The use of the payments shall be consistent with the priorities
 described in subdivision (a) of Section 38590.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) (1) The Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account is hereby established in the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply Reliability Reserve Fund.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account shall be available for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710).

(3) All revenues payable to the department pursuant to Section 80713 shall be deposited into the Load-Serving Entity Capacity Payment Account.

(i) (1) The Local Publicly Owned Electric Utility Capacity Payment Account is hereby established in the Department of Water Resources Electricity Supply
 Reliability Reserve Fund.

(2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Local Publicly Owned Electric Utility Capacity Payment Account shall be available for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 80710).

(3) All revenues payable to the department pursuant to Section 80714 shall be deposited into the Local Publicly Owned Electric Utility Capacity Payment Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 14.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Miscellaneous [80730. - 80730.]

80730.

(a) Beginning on January 31, 2023, and every May 1, August 1, and December 1 annually thereafter, the department shall issue a written report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, detailing the actions undertaken by the department in the period since the previous report was submitted pursuant to this division and up until that date, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Amount of funds expended.

(2) Purpose of funds expended.

(3) Status of actions funded.

(4) For new and expanded resources, the amount by megawatt, resource type, operational date, and
 expected lifetime of that capacity.

(5) The frequency at which resources funded by the department have been used and the extent to which they complied with the requirements of this chapter.

(6) In consultation with the state board, estimate or provide the best available information on the emissions of greenhouse gases, criteria air pollutants, and toxic air contaminants emitted by the resources funded by the department over the period since the previous report.

(7) Summary of contracts, grants, and loans issued pursuant to this division.

(b) Each report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at the same time and in the same manner as reports submitted pursuant to Section 25795 of the Public
 Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 40.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 29.5. ELIGIBLE ENERGY RESOURCE CENTRAL PROCUREMENT [80800. - 80850.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [80800. - 80806.]

80800.

This division does not reduce or modify an electrical corporation’s obligation to serve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80801.

The commission shall issue orders it determines are necessary to carry out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80802.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California has significantly reduced the emissions of greenhouse gases from its electricity sector by fostering the development of renewable and zero-carbon energy resources through the establishment of ambitious goals and policies. These efforts have fundamentally transformed the state’s portfolio of energy resources and the day-to-day operations of the state’s electrical system.

(2) The state has enabled the expansion of electrical retail choice for customers served in electrical corporation service territory, bringing new market entrants and innovation to California’s evolving retail electricity market.

(3) The state’s electrical system also faces the risk of increased disruption due to more frequent and intense extreme weather events fueled by a rapidly changing climate.

(4) For California to achieve its long-term greenhouse gas emission reduction goals, while maintaining a reliable electrical system and providing customers with greater choice in electricity retail providers, the state must establish a new, limited central procurement function within the department that enables the development of a more diverse portfolio of renewable and zero-carbon energy resources.

(b) In enacting this division, it is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(1) Create a central procurement function within the department that would only be exercised
 if, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 454.52 of the Public Utilities Code, the commission determines that there is a need for the procurement of additional eligible energy resources and requests the department to procure those resources and, in response to that request, the department elects to exercise that central procurement function to procure those resources pursuant to this division.

(2) If the department exercises that central procurement function, as described in paragraph (1), provide an opportunity for local publicly owned electric utilities to elect for the department to procure eligible energy resources on their behalf pursuant to Section 80822.

(3) Prohibit the department from recovering funds pursuant to a nonbypassable charge on the ratepayers of a load-serving entity for purposes other than providing for the department’s acquisition costs for
 eligible energy resources, including transmission, scheduling, financing, program administration, and other related costs, pursuant to Section 80821.

(4) Prohibit the department from selling any eligible energy resources it acquires pursuant to this division at more than the department’s acquisition costs, including transmission, scheduling, financing, program administration, and other related costs, when selling those resources under a long-term contract.

(5) Pursuant to Section 80821, prohibit the department from pursuing procurement activities, including, if authorized, the issuance of bonds, except upon a finding from the commission that the recovery of costs through charges on customers, the issuance of bonds, and the material terms of such bonds, including interest rates, rating, amortization, and maturity, do not unreasonably increase costs to customers on a net present
 value basis.

(6) Require the department to prioritize investments that do not compete with the procurement of eligible energy resources already planned for development and disclosed by load-serving entities or local publicly owned electric utilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80803.

The development and operation of a central procurement function program by the department, as provided in this division, is in all respects for the welfare and benefit of the people of the state, to protect the public peace, health, and safety, and constitutes an essential government purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80804.

This division shall be liberally construed in a manner so as to effectuate its purposes and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80805.

(a) The powers and responsibilities of the department established pursuant to this division are separate from, and not governed by, the provisions relating to the State Water Resources Development System, including, but not limited to, those powers and responsibilities granted pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 6 and the California Water Resources Development Bond Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6).

(b) This division does not subject the department to the jurisdictional authority of the commission or expand the jurisdiction of the commission, including that state water resources development system facilities subject to the California Water Resources Development Bond Act (Chapter
 8 (commencing with Section 12930) of Part 6 of Division 6) and the department’s other electrical generation projects or power contracts outside of those funded through the fund, remain outside the jurisdiction of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

80806.

The department may adopt regulations for purposes of administering this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [80810. - 80810.]

80810.

For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Bond” means any bond, note, or other written evidence of indebtedness issued solely for purposes of supporting the fund and other related expenses incurred by the department pursuant to this division, or for reimbursing expenditures from the fund for those purposes, establishing or maintaining reserves in connection with a bond, costs of issuance of a bond or incidental to its payment or security, capitalized interest, or renewing or refunding any bonds.

(b) “California balancing authority” has the same meaning as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code.

(c) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(d) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code.

(e) “Eligible energy resource” means an energy resource eligible to be procured by the Department of Water Resources pursuant to Section 454.52 of the Public Utilities Code that has a first point of interconnection with a California balancing authority.

(f) “Energy Commission” means the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(g) “Fund” means the Eligible Energy Resource Central Procurement Fund established in Section 80830.

(h) “Independent System Operator” means the Independent System
 Operator described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 345) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(i) “Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380 of the Public Utilities Code.

(j) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 367, Sec. 15.   (AB 1373)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Department Powers [80820. - 80828.]

80820.
